Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2130
Political subdivision inspections; file inspection codes with board; no additional license fee required; powers of political subdivision.

Any political subdivision may make provision for inspection of electrical installations within its jurisdiction, in which case it shall keep on file with the board copies of its current inspection ordinances or resolutions and codes. No political subdivision shall require any individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other business association holding a license from the board to (1) pay any license fee or (2) take any examination if the person holds a current license issued by the board which is of a classification equal to or greater than the classification needed to do the work proposed. Any such political subdivision may provide a requirement that each individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, railroad, or other business association doing electrical work within the jurisdiction of such political subdivision have on file with the political subdivision a copy of the current license issued by the board or such other evidence of such license as may be provided by the board.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-5,100;

Laws 1982, LB 605, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 546.